Massachusetts, session 194th, S479.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Subsection (g) of Section 70E of chapter 111 of the general laws as 
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition is hereby amended by striking the remainder of the 
sentence after the words, “other rendering of care,” and inserting the following: 
“and in their assigned room, including, but not limited to being the sole resident of such 
room, unless said resident, or their guardian or health care proxy, mutually agrees to share the 
room with a spouse or not more than one other resident, and that in the absence of a second 
resident, the bathroom is not shared with any other person.” 
SECTION 2. The executive office of health and human services shall, if necessary, seek 
federal approval for any appropriate increase in rates for such single-occupancy rooms. 
SECTION 3. The department of public health shall promulgate appropriate regulations to 
promote the use of single rooms and single bathrooms in every licensed facility in the 
Commonwealth. 

of 2 13  SECTION 4. This act shall apply to any new or substantial renovation, of a licensed 
facility. Every facility that holds a valid license as of the effective date of this act shall be 
allowed not more than three years from the date of this act to achieve compliance with the 
provisions herein. 
SECTION 5. Subsection (e) of said section 35TTT of chapter 10, as amended by chapter 
197 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by inserting after the word, “facilities,” the following 
words, “provided, however, that priority shall be given to projects that are intended to 
reconfigure facilities to provide single occupancy rooms for residents.